Nebraska, session 109, LB352.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB352 LB352
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-760.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
79-760.05 (1) The State Board of Education shall implement a
statewide system for tracking individual student achievement, using the
student identifier system of the State Department of Education, that can
be aggregated to track student progress by demographic characteristics,
including, but not limited to, race, poverty, high mobility, attendance,
and limited English proficiency, on available measures of student
achievement which include, but need not be limited to, national
assessment instruments, state assessment instruments, and the indicators
used in the accountability system required pursuant to section 79-760.06.
Such a system shall be designed so as to aggregate student data by
available educational input characteristics, which may include class
size, teacher education, teacher experience, special education, early
childhood programs, federal programs, and other targeted education
programs. School districts shall provide the department with individual
student achievement data from assessment instruments required pursuant to
section 79-760.03 in order to implement the statewide system.
(2)(a) The On or before August 1, 2022, the state board shall also
implement a statewide system for tracking individual student discipline,
using the student identifier system of the department, that can be
aggregated to track student discipline by type of discipline and
demographic characteristics, including, but not limited to, race,
poverty, high mobility, attendance, disability, and limited English
proficiency. The State Board of Education shall make a database for the
public that contains all student discipline data, de-identified. The
database shall be searchable by school district, school building,
offense, type of discipline imposed, type of school resource officer or
other law enforcement involvement, type of restraint, if any, and type of
seclusion, if any. The state board shall cause each school district to
track and to annually report to the State Board of Education, by
-2-

LB352 LB352
2025 2025
individual student, every any:
(i) Act by a student resulting in an in-school suspension, a short-
term suspension, a long-term suspension, a one-semester expulsion, a two-
semester expulsion, an assignment to an alternative school or to an
alternative-learning program, the use of any physical intervention by an
employee of the school district with such student, or any the restraint
or seclusion of such student;
(ii) Offense by a student constituting grounds for a long-term
suspension, an expulsion, or a mandatory reassignment pursuant to section
79-267, regardless of consequences assigned; and
(iii) Act by a student resulting in school resource officer or other
law enforcement involvement, including any incident reported to law
enforcement or to an onsite school resource officer, and any school-
related citation or arrest.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, school-related citation or
arrest shall include a citation or arrest of a student:
(i) For for any activity conducted on school grounds;
(ii) In in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school being
used for a school purpose or in a vehicle being driven for a school
purpose by a school employee or by such employee's designee;
(iii) At or at a school-sponsored activity or athletic event; or .
(iv) Arising out of involvement by a school resource officer or
other law enforcement.
(c) The system for tracking individual student discipline may also
be used to record other disciplinary incidents.
(d) The State Board of Education shall cause each school district to
Each school shall designate at least one discipline data coordinator for
the purposes of gathering and reporting the discipline data required
pursuant to this subsection. The contact information for such discipline
data coordinator shall be published on the school district's website.
(3) The department shall annually analyze and report on student
-3-

LB352 LB352
2025 2025
achievement and on student discipline for the state, each school
district, each public school, and each learning community aggregated by
the demographic characteristics described in subsection (1) of this
section. The department shall report the findings to the Governor, the
Legislature, school districts, educational service units, and each
learning community. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically. The report shall also be electronically
available to the public on the department's website. Such analysis shall
include aggregated and disaggregated data such that would indicate
differences in achievement and differences in student discipline shall be
made based on the demographic due to available educational input
characteristics described in subsection (1) of this section and the types
of discipline described in subsection (2) of this section. Such analysis
shall include indicators of progress toward state academic achievement
goals and indicators of progress toward decreased discipline for students
in poverty, limited English proficient students, students with
disabilities, and highly mobile students. The report shall not identify
any particular student.
(4) If the Commissioner of Education determines that any school
district has intentionally refused, in a material manner, to comply with
this section, the commissioner shall notify the school district of the
noncompliance and allow the school district a reasonable time to comply.
If the commissioner determines, after such time has elapsed, that the
school district is not in compliance and has not made a good-faith
attempt to comply, the commissioner shall take appropriate remedial
action within the commissioner's authority, up to and including
qualifying such noncompliance as a violation of the rules and regulations
for the accreditation of schools.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-760.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-